src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
@P.Stem.Nom@pillav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p˘illav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
pimestav+A:pimestav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@pinev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@pinev MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
pingutav+A:pingutav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@piuksuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p˘iuksuv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
plaanitav+A:plaanʲitav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
plahvatav+A:plahvatav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
poleeriv+A:pol˘eeriv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@pooldav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p˘ooldav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@praaliv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@pr˘aalʲiv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
pretendeeriv+A:pretend˘eeriv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@priiskav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@pr˘iiskav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
prognoositav+A:prognoositav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
propageeriv+A:propag˘eeriv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
pudenev+A:pudenev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@pudev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@pudev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
puhastav+A:puhastav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@puhev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@puhev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@puhkav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p˘uhkav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@puhkev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p˘uhkev MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
pulbitsev+A:pulʲbitsev MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
punerdav+A:punerdav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
punetav+A:punetav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
purustav+A:purustav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@puuduv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p˘uuduv MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@puuriv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p˘uuriv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@puutuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p˘uutuv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@põdev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@põdev MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
põgenev+A:põgenev MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
põhinev+A:põhinev MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@põiklev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p˘õiklev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
põlastav+A:põlastav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
põlatav+A:põlatav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
põletav+A:põletav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@põlev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@põlev MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@põlgav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p˘õlgav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@põnev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@põnev MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
põristav+A:põristav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
põrmustav+A:põrmustav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
põrnitsev+A:põrnitsev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@põrpiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p˘õrpiv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
põrutav+A:põrutav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@pädev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@pädev MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@pälviv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p˘älʲviv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
pärandatav+A:pärandatav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
pärinev+A:pärinev MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
päritav+A:päritav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@pärssiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p˘ärssiv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@pöörav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p˘öörav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@pöörduv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p˘öörduv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@pöörlev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p˘öörlev MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@pürgiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@p˘ürgiv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@püsiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@püsiv MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@rabav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@rabav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
rabelev+A:rabelev MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
ragisev+A:ragisev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
rahuldav+A:rahuldav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
rahustav+A:rahustav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@raiuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@r˘aiuv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
rajatav+A:rajatav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@rajav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@rajav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
rakendatav+A:rakendatav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@rappuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@r˘appuv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
raskendav+A:raskendav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
ratsutav+A:ratsutav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
ravitav+A:ravitav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
realiseeritav+A:realiseeritav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
rebitav+A:rebitav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
reguleeritav+A:reguleeritav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
reguleeriv+A:regul˘eeriv MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@reisiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@r˘eisiv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@rentiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@r˘enʲtiv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
resümeeriv+A:resüm˘eeriv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@riivav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@r˘iivav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@rikkuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@r˘ikkuv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@rippuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@r˘ippuv MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
riskeeriv+A:risk˘eeriv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@riskiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@r˘iskiv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@roiutav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@roiutav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@roniv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@roniv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@roomav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@r˘oomav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@rusuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@rusuv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@ruttav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@r˘uttav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@rõhuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@rõhuv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@rõkkav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@r˘õkkav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
rõõmustav+A:rõõmustav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@rändav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@r˘ändav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@rääkiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@r˘ääkiv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@ründav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@r˘ündav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@saabuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘aabuv MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@saadav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘aadav MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@saastav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘aastav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@saav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘aav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
saavutatav+A:saavutatav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@sadav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@sadav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@sagiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@sagiv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@salliv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘alʲliv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@salvav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘alvav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
sarnanev+A:sarnanev MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@sebiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@sebiv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
seeditav+A:seeditav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@seeduv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘eeduv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@segav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@segav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@seilav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘eilav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
seletatav+A:seletatav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
selgitav+A:selʲgitav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@seltsiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘elʲtsiv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
semutsev+A:semutsev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@seonduv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘eonduv MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@seostuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘eostuv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
sepistatav+A:sepistatav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@siduv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@siduv MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@sigiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@sigiv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
sihitav+A:sihitav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
silitav+A:silitav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@sirav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@sirav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
sisaldav+A:sisaldav MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
sisalduv+A:sisalduv MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
sisendav+A:sisendav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@siuglev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘iuglev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@sobiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@sobiv MAGUS  "weight: 6 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@solvav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘olvav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
soodustav+A:soodustav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@soosiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘oosiv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
soovitatav+A:soovitatav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
soovitav+A:soovitav MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@sooviv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘ooviv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@sorav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@sorav MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
sugereeriv+A:suger˘eeriv MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@suhtlev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘uhtlev MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@suitsev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘uitsev MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@sujuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@sujuv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@sulav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@sulav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
suletav+A:suletav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
sumisev+A:sumisev MAGUS  "weight: 11 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@sundiv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘unʲdiv MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@surev+A:@P.Stem.Nom@surev MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@surmav+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘urmav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
suunatav+A:suunatav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@suunduv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘uunduv MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
suurendav+A:suurendav MAGUS  "weight: 9 " ; 
suurenev+A:suurenev MAGUS  "weight: 8 " ; 
sõlmitav+A:sõlʲmitav MAGUS  "weight: 10 " ; 
@P.Stem.Nom@sõltuv+A:@P.Stem.Nom@s˘õltuv MAGUS  "weight: 7 " ; 
